Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-842.01
Boundary bridge; consent for purchase, operation, and maintenance; counties, cities, and towns of an adjoining state; not exempt from taxation.

Consent of the State of Nebraska is hereby given to counties, cities and towns of any adjoining state to purchase, operate and maintain bridges extending across a stream which, at the point of crossing, is on a boundary line of the State of Nebraska, and a right-of-way to give access to such bridge from the highway system of this state; Provided, that the consent herein granted shall not be construed to exempt any property acquired hereunder from taxation.

Laws 1945, c. 96, § 1, p. 320.